Utah statutes.
20A-3-402.   Scope of part.
(1)  This part governs:
(a)  each military or overseas citizen voter who is or expects to be absent on
election day from the place in which he resides or is registered to vote,
regardless of whether the military or overseas citizen voter is within or
outside the territorial limits of the United States at the time of voting; and
(b)  any overseas citizen voter whose overseas service was terminated by
discharge from the armed forces, by separation from the merchant marine, or by
termination of service or employment outside the territorial limits of the
United States too late to enable that voter to register to vote as required by
this title.
(2)  All other persons may vote by absentee ballot only as provided in Part 3.
